Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Duties and Operation of Filing Office.

§ 8.9A-519.
Numbering, maintaining, and indexing records; communicating information provided in records.

Filing office duties. For each record filed in a filing office, the filing office shall:

assign a unique number to the filed record;

create a record that bears the number assigned to the filed record and the date and time of filing;

maintain the filed record for public inspection; and

index the filed record in accordance with subsections (c), (d), and (e).

File number. A file number assigned after January 1, 2002, must include a digit that:

is mathematically derived from or related to the other digits of the file number; and

aids the filing office in determining whether a number communicated as the file number includes a single-digit or transpositional error.

Indexing; general. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (e), the filing office shall:

index an initial financing statement according to the name of the debtor and index all filed records relating to the initial financing statement in a manner that associates with one another an initial financing statement and all filed records relating to the initial financing statement; and

index a record that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates also according to the name that was not previously provided.

Indexing; real-property-related financing statement. If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, it must be filed for record and the filing office shall index it:

under the names of the debtor and of each owner of record shown on the financing statement as if they were the mortgagors under a mortgage of the real property described; and

to the extent that the law of the Commonwealth provides for indexing of records of mortgages under the name of the mortgagee, under the name of the secured party as if the secured party were the mortgagee thereunder, or, if indexing is by description, as if the financing statement were a record of a mortgage of the real property described.

Indexing; real-property-related assignment. If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, the filing office shall index an assignment filed under §

8.9A-514 (a)

or an amendment filed under §

8.9A-514 (b)

:

under the name of the assignor as grantor; and

to the extent that the law of the Commonwealth provides for indexing a record of the assignment of a mortgage under the name of the assignee, under the name of the assignee.

Retrieval and association capability. The filing office shall maintain a capability:

to retrieve a record by the name of the debtor and by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

to associate and retrieve with one another an initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

Removal of debtor’s name. The filing office may not remove a debtor’s name from the index until one year after the effectiveness of a financing statement naming the debtor lapses under §

8.9A-515

with respect to all secured parties of record.

Timeliness of filing office performance. The filing office shall perform the acts required by subsections (a) through (e) at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule, but not later than five business days after the filing office receives the record in question.

Inapplicability to real-property-related filing office. Subsections (b) and (h) do not apply to a filing office described in §

8.9A-501 (a)

(1).

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-403; 1973, c. 509; 1975, c. 225; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, c. 284; 1982, c. 652; 1984, cc. 40, 771; 1985, c. 297; 1988, c. 804; 1990, cc. 89, 412; 1992, c. 784; 2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

The uniform act contains two alternatives for subdivision (f) of this section. Virginia adopted alternative A. Alternative B reads:

“(f) Retrieval and association capability.
The filing office shall maintain a capability:

“(1) to retrieve a record by the name of the debtor and:

“(A) if the filing office is described in Section 9-501 (a) (1), by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the date [and time] that the record was filed [or recorded]; or

“(B) if the filing office is described in Section 9-501 (a) (2), by
the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

“(2) to associate and retrieve with one another an initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial financing statement.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97.1.

§ 8.9A-520.
Acceptance and refusal to accept record.

Mandatory refusal to accept record. A filing office shall refuse to accept a record for filing for a reason set forth in §

8.9A-516 (b)

and may refuse to accept a record for filing only for a reason set forth in §

8.9A-516 (b)

.

Communication concerning refusal. If a filing office refuses to accept a record for filing, it shall communicate to the person that presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been filed had the filing office accepted it. The communication must be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule but, in the case of a filing office described in §

8.9A-501 (a)

(2), in no event more than five business days after the filing office receives the record.

When filed financing statement effective. A filed financing statement satisfying §

8.9A-502 (a)

and (b) is effective, even if the filing office is required to refuse to accept it for filing under subsection (a). However, §

8.9A-338

applies to a filed financing statement providing information described in §

8.9A-516 (b)

(5) which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

Separate application to multiple debtors. If a record communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to more than one debtor, this part applies as to each debtor separately.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-521.
Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 155, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor’s note.

Former §

8.9A-521

, Uniform form of written financing statement and amendment, derived from Acts 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-521.1.
Format of statements and records.

A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written initial financing statement, an amendment to a financing statement, or other written record in a form and format promulgated by the State Corporation Commission except for a reason set forth in §

8.9A-516(b)

.

History.

2012, c. 155.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 155, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

§ 8.9A-522.
Maintenance and destruction of records.

Post-lapse maintenance and retrieval of information. The filing office shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed financing statement for at least one year after the effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under §

8.9A-515

with respect to all secured parties of record. The record must be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

Destruction of written records. Except to the extent that a statute governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office immediately may destroy any written record evidencing a financing statement. However, if the filing office destroys a written record, it shall maintain another record of the financing statement which complies with subsection (a).

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-403; 1973, c. 509; 1975, c. 225; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, c. 284; 1982, c. 652; 1984, cc. 40, 771; 1985, c. 297; 1988, c. 804; 1990, cc. 89, 412; 1992, c. 784; 2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

The uniform act contains two alternatives for subdivision (a) of this section. Virginia adopted alternative A.
Alternative B reads:

“(a) Post-lapse maintenance and retrieval of information. The filing office shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed financing statement for at least one year after the effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under 9-515 with respect to all secured parties of record. The record must be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and:

“(1) if the record was filed [or recorded] in the filing office described in Section 9-501 (a) (1), by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the date [and time] that the record was filed [or recorded]; or

“(2) if the record was filed in the filing office described in Section 9-501 (a) (2), by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.”

§ 8.9A-523.
Information from filing office; sale or license of records.

Acknowledgment of filing written record. — If a person that files a written record requests an acknowledgment of the filing, the filing office shall send to the person an image of the record showing the number assigned to the record pursuant to §

8.9A-519 (a)

(1) and the date and time of the filing of the record. However, if the person furnishes a copy of the record to the filing office, the filing office may instead:

note upon the copy the number assigned to the record pursuant to §

8.9A-519 (a)

(1) and the date and time of the filing of the record; and

send the copy to the person.

Acknowledgment of filing other record. — If a person files a record other than a written record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment that provides:

the information in the record;

the number assigned to the record pursuant to §

8.9A-519 (a)

(1); and

the date and time of the filing of the record.

Communication of requested information. — The filing office shall communicate or otherwise make available in a record the following information to any person that requests it:

whether there is on file on a date and time specified by the filing office, but not a date earlier than six business days before the filing office receives the request, any financing statement that:

designates a particular debtor or, if the request so states, designates a particular debtor at the address specified in the request;

has not lapsed under §

8.9A-515

with respect to all secured parties of record; and

if the request so states, has lapsed under §

8.9A-515

and a record of which is maintained by the filing office under §

8.9A-522 (a)

;

the date and time of filing of each financing statement; and

the information provided in each financing statement.

Medium for communicating information. — In complying with its duty under subsection (c), the filing office may communicate information in any medium or, in the alternative, may provide the requestor with a list of persons that provide private record research services. However, if requested, the filing office shall communicate information by issuing its written certificate.

Timeliness of filing office performance. — The filing office shall perform the acts required by subsections (a) through (d) at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule, but not later than five business days after the filing office receives the request.

Public availability of records. — At least weekly, the State Corporation Commission shall offer to sell or license to the public on a nonexclusive basis, in bulk, copies of all records filed in it under this part, in every medium from time to time available to the filing office.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2002, c. 244.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 244 inserted “or, in the alternative, may provide the requestor with a list of persons that provide private record research services” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (d).

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 8.9A-524.
Delay by filing office.

Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by this part is excused if:

the delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office; and

the filing office exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-525.
Fees.

Initial financing statement or other record; general rule. — Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), the fee for filing and indexing a record under this part is twenty dollars.

[Repealed.]

Number of names. — The number of names required to be indexed does not affect the amount of the fee in subsection (a).

Response to information request. — The fee for responding to a request for information from the filing office, other than the State Corporation Commission, including for issuing a certificate showing whether there is on file any financing statement naming a particular debtor, is twenty dollars. The fees for responding to requests for information from the State Corporation Commission made pursuant to this title are governed by §

12.1-21.1

.

Record of mortgage. — This section does not require a fee with respect to a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut under §

8.9A-502 (c)

. However, the recording and satisfaction fees that otherwise would be applicable to the record of the mortgage apply.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2002, c. 71.

Editor’s note.

As originally enacted, this section added “or other record” in the introductory language of subdivision (a), and substituted “other than an initial financing statement of the kind described in subsection (b)” for the language in the uniform code referencing § 9-502 (c) as the location of that description.
The section added “public-finance and manufactured-housing transactions” in the introductory language of subdivision (b).
Throughout the section Virginia set the fee routinely at twenty dollars and did not incorporate the various fee formulas used in the uniform code act. The uniform act contains two alternatives for subdivision (c) of this section.
Virginia adopted alternative A. Alternative B reads: “(c) Number of names.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), if a record is communicated in writing, the fee for each name more that two required to be indexed is $
_______________
.”
In subdivision (d) Virginia included language establishing a different fee schedule for information requests from the State Corporation Commission.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 71 deleted “other than an initial financing statement of the kind described in subsection (b)” following “this part” in subsection (a); repealed subsection (b); and substituted “subsection (a)” for “subsections (a) and (b)” at the end of subsection (c).

§ 8.9A-526.
Promulgation of rules.

The State Corporation Commission shall promulgate and make available to the public such rules as it deems necessary to implement this title. Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with applicable law.

When adopting such rules and establishing filing office practices, the Commission shall make an effort to keep such rules and practices in harmony with the rules and practices of other jurisdictions which enact substantially similar legislation and, to the extent feasible, to keep the technology it uses compatible with the technology used by such other jurisdictions. To this end, the Commission shall consult with such other jurisdictions, and take into account the most recent version of any Model Rules proposed by the International Association of Commercial Administrators, or any successor organization.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

Editor’s note.

This section effectuates the policy of jurisdictional harmony in the promulgation of rules as stated in the uniform act, and incorporates the consultation procedures set out in the uniform act.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “International Association of Commercial Administrators” for “International Association of Corporate Administrators” near the end of subsection (b).

§ 8.9A-527.
Duty to report.

The State Corporation Commission may report annually to the Governor and General Assembly on the operation of the filing office. The report may contain a statement of the extent to which:

the filing-office rules are not in harmony with the rules of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part and the reasons for these variations; and

the filing-office rules are not in harmony with the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Commercial Administrators, or any successor organization, and the reasons for these variations.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “International Association of Commercial Administrators” for “International Association of Corporate Administrators” near the end of subdivision (2).